North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-33.1 Taxation of Cooperative Electrical Generating Plants [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 539, § 8]

57-33.1-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 539, § 8]

57-33.1-02.
Imposition of taxes — In lieu of ad valorem taxes. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 539, § 8]

57-33.1-03.
Report. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 539, § 8]

57-33.1-04.
Notification of tax liability — Appeal to commissioner. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 539, § 8]

57-33.1-05.
Date when taxes due — Payable to tax commissioner — Penalties. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 539, § 8]

57-33.1-06.
Lien for tax. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 539, § 8]

57-33.1-07.
Moneys to be deposited with state treasurer. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 539, § 8]

57-33.1-08.
Allocation by state treasurer.

[Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 539, § 8]

57-33.1-09.
Duty of county treasurer — Allocation to political subdivisions. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 539, § 8]

57-33.1-10.
Rules and regulations — Bond — Reports — Actions. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 539, § 8]

57-33.1-11.
Appeals from decision of tax commissioner. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 539, § 8]

57-33.1-12.
Penalty. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 539, § 8]